es: Nivel de certificación Sold Secure: Bronce; Diamante; Oro; Sin certificación; Plata; Otro
nb: Sold Secure-sertifiseringsnivå: Bronse; Diamant; Gull; Ikke sertifisert; Sølv; Annet
ro-RO: Nivel de certificare Sold Secure: Bronz; Diamant; Aur; Necertificat; Argint; Altele
fr: Niveau de certification Sold Secure: Bronze; Diamant; Or; Non certifié; Argent; Autre
zh-CN: Sold Secure 安全认证级别: 铜级; 钻石级; 金级; 未认证; 银级; 其他
nl: Sold Secure certificeringsniveau: Brons; Diamant; Goud; Niet gecertificeerd; Zilver; Anders
sv: Sold Secure-certifieringsnivå: Brons; Diamant; Guld; Inte certifierad; Silver; Övrigt
sk-SK: Úroveň certifikácie Sold Secure: Bronzová; Diamantová; Zlatá; Necertifikovaná; Strieborná; Iná
ja: Sold Secure認証レベル: ブロンズ; ダイヤモンド; ゴールド; 認定なし; シルバー; その他
cs: Úroveň certifikace Sold Secure: Bronzová; Diamantová; Zlatá; Bez certifikace; Stříbrná; Jiné
ko: Sold Secure 인증 등급: 브론즈; 다이아몬드; 골드; 인증 안 됨; 실버; 기타
th: ระดับการรับรอง Sold Secure: บรอนซ์; ไดมอนด์; โกลด์; ไม่ได้รับการรับรอง; ซิลเวอร์; อื่นๆ
tr: Sold Secure sertifikasyon seviyesi: Bronz; Elmas; Altın; Sertifikasız; Gümüş; Diğer
el: Επίπεδο πιστοποίησης Sold Secure: Χάλκινο; Διαμαντένιο; Χρυσό; Μη πιστοποιημένο; Ασημένιο; Άλλο
sl-SI: Stopnja certifikacije Sold Secure: Bron; Diamant; Zlato; Ni certificirano; Srebro; Drugo
fi: Sold Secure -sertifiontitaso: Pronssi; Timantti; Kulta; Ei sertifiointia; Hopea; Muu
it: Livello di certificazione Sold Secure: Bronzo; Diamante; Oro; Non certificato; Argento; Altro
zh-TW: Sold Secure 認證等級: 銅級; 鑽石級; 金級; 未認證; 銀級; 其他
bg-BG: Ниво на сертификация по стандарта Sold Secure: Бронз; Диамант; Злато; Не е сертифицирано; Сребро; Друго
pt-BR: Sold Secure certificação nível: Bronze; Diamante; Ouro; Não certificado; Prata; Outro
de: Sold-Secure-Zertifizierungsstufe: Bronze; Diamant; Gold; Nicht zertifiziert; Silber; Andere
pl: Poziom certyfikacji Sold Secure: Brązowy; Diamentowy; Złoty; Brak certyfikatu; Srebrny; Inny
hr-HR: Razina certifikacije Sold Secure: Bronca; Dijamant; Zlato; Nije certificirano; Srebro; Ostalo
pt-PT: Nível de certificação Sold Secure: Bronze; Diamante; Ouro; Não certificada; Prata; Outra
vi: Mức độ chứng nhận an toàn đã bán: Đồng; Kim cương; Vàng; Không được chứng nhận; Bạc; Khác
lt-LT: „Sold Secure“ sertifikavimo lygis: Bronzinis; Deimantinis; Auksinis; Nesertifikuotas; Sidabrinis; Kita
da: Sold Secure-certificeringsniveau: Bronze; Diamant; Guld; Ikke certificeret; Sølv; Andet
hu: Sold Secure minősítési szint: Bronz; Gyémánt; Arany; Nem tanúsított; Ezüst; Egyéb
en: Sold Secure certification level: Bronze; Diamond; Gold; Not certified; Silver; Other
ru: Уровень сертификации Sold Secure: Бронза; Бриллиант; Золото; Не сертифицировано; Серебро; Другое